Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 5. Judicial Department
§ 15. Style of process.

The style of all process shall be “The State of Wyoming.” All prosecutions shall be carried on in the name and by the authority of the State of Wyoming, and conclude “against the peace and dignity of the State of Wyoming.”

Cross references. —

As to civil process generally, see ch. 6 of title 1.

As to issuance, form and service of process, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

As to indictment and information, see Rule 9, W.R. Cr. P.

Complaint which does not comply with this section is insufficient

to charge a crime under the statute. Stutsman v. Cheyenne, 18 Wyo. 499, 113 P. 322,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1911).

Information under habitual criminal statute charging convictionsoutside state. —

An information under the habitual criminal statute, which charged that defendant had been convicted of five prior felonies outside the state, was not defective on the ground that the words “against the peace and dignity of the State of Wyoming” were not inserted after each paragraph describing a prior conviction, since the words above quoted apply only to informations charging offenses committed in Wyoming. Waxler v. State, 67 Wyo. 396, 224 P.2d 514,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1950).

Order of commitment for contempt. —

The fact that an order to show cause why defendant should not be punished for contempt was not styled in the name of the state does not render the order of commitment void, where defendant voluntarily submitted to the order to show cause. Ex parte Bergman, 3 Wyo. 396, 26 P. 914,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1890).

County not liable in damages for unlawful trial. —

In prosecution before a justice of an offense over which he had no jurisdiction save as examining magistrate, complaint being signed by prosecuting attorney, where the justice unlawfully tried case and imposed fine, county was not liable in damages, in absence of evidence that it was in any manner implicated in the proceedings. Houtz v. Board of Comm'rs, 11 Wyo. 152, 70 P. 840,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1902).

Quoted

in

Blake v. Rupe, 651 P.2d 1096,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

State v. Smart, 22 Wyo. 154, 136 P. 452,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1913); Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(2004); Webster v. State, 2016 WY 76, 376 P.3d 488,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 16. Supreme court judges limited to judicial duties.

No duties shall be imposed by law upon the supreme court or any of the judges thereof, except such as are judicial, nor shall any of the judges thereof exercise any power of appointment except as herein provided.

Cross references. —

For other provisions relative to supreme court, see §

5-2-101

to 5-2-403.

Inhibition upon legislature as to imposition of judicial duties. —

The only express inhibition upon the legislature as to the imposition of judicial duties upon the supreme court or any member thereof is contained in this section. State ex rel. Bennett v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 56, 32 P. 14,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1892).

§ 17. Salaries of judges of supreme and district courts.

The judges of the supreme and district courts shall receive such compensation for their services as may be prescribed by law, which compensation shall not be increased or diminished during the term for which a judge shall have been elected, and the salary of a judge of the supreme or district court shall be as may be prescribed by law; provided, however, that when any legislative increase or decrease in the salary of the justices or judges of such courts whose respective terms of office do not expire at the same time, has heretofore or shall hereafter become effective as to any member of such court, it shall be effective from such date as to each of the members thereof. (As amended by Laws 1953, House Joint Resolution No. 5, p. 286.)

Cross references. —

For amount of annual salary, see §

5-1-110

.

Section inapplicable to county courts. —

This section is not intended to apply to all state court judges elected to staggered terms, such as county courts. It makes reference only to “supreme and district courts.” When reference is made to “such court,” it is a reference back to “supreme and district courts.” County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1988).

Right of judge appointed to fill vacancy to increase in salary. —

The administrative officers of the state have, since 1921, construed this section as requiring that when one of the justices or judges dies or resigns and the legislature has in the meantime increased the salary of the office, the appointee to fill the vacancy is entitled to the increase of the salary granted by the legislature. Ballangee v. Board of County Comm'rs, 66 Wyo. 390, 212 P.2d 71,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1949).

Cited

in

Board of Comm'rs v. Burns, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1892).

§ 18. Appeals from district courts to supreme court.

Writs of error and appeals may be allowed from the decisions of the district courts to the supreme court under such regulations as may be prescribed by law.

Cross references. —

As to appellate review of district court rulings adverse to the state in criminal prosecutions, see §§

7-12-102

to

7-12-104

.

As to appellate procedure generally, see Rules 1 through 29, W.R.A.P.

Appeal may be taken from a judgment entered by the district court in vacation.

Anderson v. Matthews, 8 Wyo. 307, 57 P. 156,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1899).

Cited

in

Mau v. Stoner, 14 Wyo. 183, 83 P. 218,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(1905).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

§ 19. State divided into districts; election and terms of district judges.

Until otherwise provided by law, the state shall be divided into three judicial districts, in each of which there shall be elected at general elections, by the electors thereof, one judge of the district court therein, whose term shall be six (6) years from the first Monday in January succeeding his election and until his successor is duly qualified.

Cross references. —

For general provision concerning district judges, see §

5-3-102

.

As to election and terms of district judges, see §

22-2-105

.

Reduction in number not unconstitutional. —

An act reducing the number of judicial districts and judges is not unconstitutional. Brown v. Clark, 47 Wyo. 216, 34 P.2d 17,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1934).

Term “district court” is used in a broad or inclusive sense

as if there were 1 district court in a given judicial district for several counties, and as if there were one district court in a given county for the several jurisdictions such as civil, criminal and probate. Gaunt v. Kansas Univ. Endowment Ass'n, 379 P.2d 825,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1963).

Length of term of judge elected to fill vacancy. —

A judge of the district court who was elected to fill a vacancy was entitled to hold the office for the full term of six years. State ex rel. Burdick v. Schnitger, 17 Wyo. 65, 96 P. 238,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1908).

Effective date of act postponed if term of judge shortened. —

Where the date fixed by the act for it to become effective would shorten the term of a judge, in violation of the constitutional provision, the court may postpone its effective date until the term of the judge has expired. Brown v. Clark, 47 Wyo. 216, 34 P.2d 17,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1934).

Effect of military service. —

A district judge who, during term of office, entered the service of the United States as a major in advocate general's department, upon returning to and resuming the office of district judge, was a de jure and not a de facto judge, where he had not resigned and his office had not been declared vacant and no successor had qualified. State ex rel. Raymond v. Jefferis, 26 Wyo. 115, 178 P. 909,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1919).

Title of act held sufficient. —

“An act to define the judicial districts of the state, and prescribing the time for holding the terms of the district court in the several counties of each judicial district,” was sufficient title for the subject of the act. In re Board of Comm'rs, 4 Wyo. 133, 32 P. 850 (Wyo. 1893).

Cited

in

Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(2004).

§ 20. Districts defined.

Until otherwise provided by law, said judicial districts shall be constituted as follows: District number one shall consist of the counties of Laramie, Converse and Crook. District number two shall consist of the counties of Albany, Johnson and Sheridan. District number three shall consist of the counties of Carbon, Sweetwater, Uinta and Fremont.

Cross references. —

For current enumeration of judicial districts, see §

5-3-101

.

Authority of legislature to increase or diminish number of judicial districts

is not restricted by § 21 of this article, except as to removal of a judge from office and the increasing of districts before taxable valuations of property exceed a certain amount. Brown v. Clark, 47 Wyo. 216, 34 P.2d 17,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1934).

Cited

in

Mau v. Stoner, 14 Wyo. 183, 83 P. 218,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(1905); State ex rel. Burdick v. Schnitger, 17 Wyo. 65, 96 P. 238,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1908); State ex rel. Wyo. Farm Loan Bd. v. Herschler, 622 P.2d 1378,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1981).

§ 21. Increase in number of districts and judges.

The legislature may from time to time increase the number of said judicial districts and the judges thereof, but such increase or change in the boundaries of the district shall not work the removal of any judge from his office during the term for which he may have been elected or appointed; provided the number of districts and district judges shall not exceed four (4) until the valuation of taxable property in the state shall be equal to one hundred million ($100,000,000) dollars.

Cross references. —

For current enumeration of judicial districts, see §

5-3-101

.

As to number of judges, etc., see §

5-3-102

.

Reduction in number not unconstitutional. —

An act reducing the number of judicial districts and judges is not unconstitutional, as this section by its provision is authority for the legislature to increase or diminish the number of districts, and there are no restrictions except as to the removal of a judge, and except that the increase in taxable valuation must exceed a certain amount before increases are made. Brown v. Clark, 47 Wyo. 216, 34 P.2d 17,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1934).

Effective date of act postponed if term of judge shortened. —

Where the date fixed by the act for it to become effective would shorten the term of a judge, in violation of the constitutional provision, the court may postpone its effective date until the term of the judge has expired. Brown v. Clark, 47 Wyo. 216, 34 P.2d 17,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1934).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Burdick v. Schnitger, 17 Wyo. 65, 96 P. 238,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1908).

§ 22. Jurisdiction of justices of the peace. [Repealed.]

Section repealed. —

This section was repealed by a constitutional amendment proposed by Laws 1965, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 518, adopted by a vote of the people on November 8, 1966, and proclaimed in effect January 17, 1967.

§ 23. Appeals from justices' courts. [Repealed.]

Section repealed. —

This section was repealed by a constitutional amendment proposed by Laws 1965, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 518, adopted by a vote of the people on November 8, 1966, and proclaimed in effect January 17, 1967.

§ 24. Terms of district courts; attaching unorganized territory to organized counties.

The time of holding courts in the several counties of a district shall be as prescribed by law, and the legislature shall make provisions for attaching unorganized counties or territory to organized counties for judicial purposes.

Cross references. —

As to terms of district courts, see §

5-3-101

.

§ 25. Judges of supreme and district courts shall not practice.

No judge of the supreme or district court shall act as attorney or counsellor at law.

Cross references. —

For provision that supreme court justices shall not practice law, see §

5-2-112

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and application of state statute prohibiting judge from practicing law, 17 ALR4th 829.

§ 26. Power to fix terms of court.

Until the legislature shall provide by law for fixing the terms of courts, the judges of the supreme court and district courts shall fix the terms thereof.

Cross references. —

As to regular term of supreme court, see §

5-2-101

.

As to special terms of supreme court, see §§

5-2-103

to

5-2-105

.

As to terms of district courts, see §

5-3-101

.

Jury terms for justice courts were established by supreme court pursuant to this section.

Petersen v. State, 594 P.2d 978,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 411

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 27. Judges of supreme and district courts shall not hold other office.

No judge of the supreme or district court shall be elected or appointed to any other than judicial offices or be eligible thereto during the term for which he was elected or appointed such judge.

Certain administrative functions have been delegated to district judges in the

Wyoming State Treasurer ex rel. Workmen's Compensation Dep't v. Christiansen, 491 P.2d 1251,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 273

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 28. Appeals from boards of arbitration.

Appeals from decisions of compulsory boards of arbitration shall be allowed to the supreme court of the state, and the manner of taking such appeals shall be prescribed by law.

Cross references. —

As to arbitration in civil cases before justices of the peace, see §§

1-21-801

to

1-21-804

.

Eminent domain. —

Act authorizing city to condemn land within or without the corporate limits is not violative of this provision of the constitution. Edwards v. Cheyenne, 19 Wyo. 110, 114 P. 677,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1911), reh'g denied, 19 Wyo. 110, 122 P. 900,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1912).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Uninsured Motorist Act: A Regulatory Reconciliation of Mandated Coverages with the Standard Uninsured Motorist Endorsement,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 213 (1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage: enforceability of policy provision limiting appeals from arbitration, 23 ALR5th 801.

§ 29. Juvenile delinquency and domestic relations courts.

The legislature may by general law provide for such juvenile delinquency and domestic relations courts as may be needed, and for the number, qualifications and election of judges of such courts. Appeals shall lie in such cases and pursuant to such regulations as may be prescribed by law. Such courts shall have such jurisdiction as the legislature may by law provide. (As added by Laws 1947, Senate Joint Resolution No. 7, p. 260.)

Cross references. —

As to juvenile courts, see §§

14-6-201

through

14-6-252

.

Jurisdictio properly invoked.—

Juvenile court’s jurisdiction was properly invoked because the State filed a petition while the child was a minor alleging that the mother had neglected her. RH v. State (In the Interest of BG), 2019 WY 116, 451 P.3d 1161,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2019).

Quoted

in

JA v. State, 2008 WY 15,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Feb. 8, 2008).

Stated

in

NJC v. State, 913 P.2d 435,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The 1951 Juvenile Court Law of Wyoming,” see 8 Wyo. L.J. 173.

For comment, “The Wyoming Juvenile Court Act of 1971,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 237 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Jurisdiction or power of juvenile court to order parent of juvenile to make restitution for juvenile's offense, 66 ALR4th 985.

Family court jurisdiction to hear contract claims, 46 ALR5th 735.

Law reviews. —

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).